Massachusetts, session 194th, S1966.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The first paragraph of section 2C of chapter 59 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the first sentence the
following sentence:- Prior to executing the purchase and sale agreement for the sale of land or
property that would result in the grantee making a payment in lieu of taxes pursuant to this
section, the seller, except in cases where the seller is the United States, the commonwealth, or a
county, city or town, or any instrumentality thereof, shall provide the grantee with a written
notice identifying the grantee’s obligation to make such payment.
SECTION 2. Said section 2C of said chapter 59, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the word “later”, in line 33, the following words:- ; provided,
however, that if the seller, except in cases where the seller is the United States, the
of 2

commonwealth, or a county, city or town, or any instrumentality thereof, fails to provide the
grantee with written notice identifying the grantee’s obligation to make payment under this
section prior to executing the purchase and sale agreement, such amounts shall be paid by the
seller.
of 2